Nebraska, session 109, LB345.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB345 LB345
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 75-104, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
75-104 (1) Until January 7, 2027 4, 2007, the annual salary of each
commissioner shall be fifty thousand dollars. Commencing January 4, 2007,
the annual salary of each commissioner shall be seventy-five thousand
dollars. Commencing January 7, 2027, the annual salary of each
commissioner shall be XX thousand dollars.
(2) Each commissioner shall be entitled to receive from the state
his or her mileage expenses incurred while traveling in the line of duty
to and from his or her residence to the office of the Public Service
Commission in Lincoln pursuant to the following conditions:
(a) The Public Service Commission has adopted and promulgated rules
and regulations establishing guidelines for allowable reimbursement of
such mileage expenses, except that such mileage rate shall not exceed the
mileage rate established by the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to section 81-1176;
(b) The request for such reimbursement falls within such guidelines;
and
(c) The total amounts authorized for such reimbursement of mileage
expenses in any fiscal year does not cause the total expenses to exceed
the total funds appropriated to the program established for
commissioners' expenses. In addition thereto, the commissioners,
executive director, clerks, and other employees of the commission shall
be reimbursed for expenses, including the cost of transportation while
traveling on the business of the commission, to be paid in the same
manner as other requests for payment or reimbursement from the state. In
computing the cost of transportation for the commissioners, executive
director, clerks, and other employees, no mileage or other traveling
expense shall be requested or allowed unless sections 81-1174 to 81-1177
are strictly complied with.
Sec. 2. Section 84-201.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-2-

LB345 LB345
2025 2025
amended to read:
84-201.01 Until January 7, 2027 4, 2007, the annual salary of the
Attorney General shall be seventy-five thousand dollars. Commencing
January 4, 2007, the annual salary of the Attorney General shall be
ninety-five thousand dollars. Commencing January 7, 2027, the annual
salary of the Attorney General shall be XX thousand dollars. The salary
of the Attorney General shall be payable in equal monthly installments.
Sec. 3. Section 84-721, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-721 Until January 7, 2027 4, 2007, there shall be paid as
salaries to certain constitutional officers as follows: Secretary of
State, the sum of sixty-five thousand dollars per year; Auditor of Public
Accounts, the sum of sixty thousand dollars per year; State Treasurer,
the sum of sixty thousand dollars per year; and Lieutenant Governor, the
sum of sixty thousand dollars per year. Commencing January 4, 2007, there
shall be paid as salaries to certain constitutional officers as follows:
Secretary of State, the sum of eighty-five thousand dollars per year;
Auditor of Public Accounts, the sum of eighty-five thousand dollars per
year; State Treasurer, the sum of eighty-five thousand dollars per year;
and Lieutenant Governor, the sum of seventy-five thousand dollars per
year. Commencing January 7, 2027, there shall be paid as salaries to
certain constitutional officers as follows: Secretary of State, the sum
of XX thousand dollars per year; Auditor of the Public Accounts, the sum
of XX thousand dollars per year; State Treasurer, the sum of XX thousand
dollars per year; and Lieutenant Governor, the sum of XX thousand dollars
per year. Such salaries shall be payable in equal monthly installments.
Sec. 4. Original sections 84-201.01 and 84-721, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and section 75-104, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-3-